Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.43
Violations; Attorney General; maintain
action.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of
section 81-885.31, whenever, in the judgment of the commission,
any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices which
constitute or will constitute a violation of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, the
Attorney General may maintain an action in the name of the State of Nebraska,
in the district court of the county in which such violation or
threatened violation occurred, to abate and temporarily and permanently enjoin
such acts and practices and to enforce compliance with the act. The plaintiff shall
not be required to give any bond nor shall any court costs be adjudged against
the plaintiff.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 43;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 11.